Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1481
Written rental agreement; delivery.

If there is a written rental agreement, the landlord shall tender and deliver a signed copy of the rental agreement to the tenant and the tenant shall sign and deliver to the landlord one fully executed copy of the rental agreement. Failure to comply with this section shall be deemed a material noncompliance with the rental agreement by the landlord or the tenant, as the case may be.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 32.